Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 7. Remedies.

Sec. 45.02.701.
Remedies for breach of collateral contracts not impaired.

Remedies for breach of an obligation or promise collateral or ancillary to a contract for sale are not impaired by this chapter.

History.

(§ 2.701 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.702.
Seller’s remedies on discovery of buyer’s insolvency.

If the seller discovers the buyer is insolvent, the seller may refuse delivery except for cash including payment for all goods previously delivered under the contract, and stop delivery under AS

45.02.705

.

If the seller discovers that the buyer has received goods on credit while insolvent, the seller may reclaim the goods upon demand made within 10 days after the receipt, but if misrepresentation of solvency has been made to the particular seller in writing within three months before delivery the 10-day limitation does not apply. Except as provided in this subsection the seller may not base a right to reclaim goods on the buyer’s fraudulent or innocent misrepresentation of solvency or of intent to pay.

The seller’s right to reclaim under (b) of this section is subject to the rights of a buyer in ordinary course or other good faith purchaser or lien creditor under AS

45.02.403

. Successful reclamation of goods excludes all other remedies with respect to them.

History.

(§ 2.702 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.703.
Seller’s remedies in general.

If the buyer wrongfully rejects or revokes acceptance of goods or fails to make a payment due on or before delivery or repudiates with respect to a part or the whole, then with respect to goods directly affected and, if the breach is of the whole contract (AS

45.02.612

), then also with respect to the whole undelivered balance, the aggrieved seller may

withhold delivery of the goods;

stop delivery by a bailee as provided in AS

45.02.705

;

proceed under AS

45.02.704

respecting goods still unidentified to the contract;

resell and recover damages as provided in AS

45.02.706

;

recover damages for nonacceptance (AS

45.02.708

) or in a proper case the price (AS

45.02.709

);

cancel.

History.

(§ 2.703 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

Measure of recovery where buyer repudiates contract for goods to be manufactured to special order, before completion of manufacture, 42 ALR3d 182.

Sec. 45.02.704.
Seller’s right to identify goods to the contract notwithstanding breach or to salvage unfinished goods.

An aggrieved seller under AS

45.02.703

may

identify to the contract conforming goods not already identified if at the time the seller learned of the breach they are in the seller’s possession or control;

treat as the subject of resale goods that have demonstrably been intended for the particular contract even though those goods are unfinished.

Where the goods are unfinished, an aggrieved seller may in the exercise of reasonable commercial judgment for the purposes of avoiding loss and of effective realization either complete the manufacture and wholly identify the goods to the contract or cease manufacture and resell for scrap or salvage value or proceed in any other reasonable manner.

History.

(§ 2.704 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.705.
Seller’s stoppage of delivery in transit or otherwise.

The seller may stop delivery of goods in the possession of a carrier or other bailee when the seller discovers the buyer to be insolvent (AS

45.02.702

) and may stop delivery of carload, truckload, planeload, or larger shipments of express or freight when the buyer repudiates or fails to make a payment due before delivery or if for any other reason the seller has a right to withhold or reclaim the goods.

As against the buyer, the seller may stop delivery until

receipt of the goods by the buyer;

acknowledgment to the buyer by a bailee of the goods, except a carrier, that the bailee holds the goods for the buyer;

an acknowledgment to the buyer under (1) or (2) of this subsection by a carrier by reshipment or as a warehouse; or

negotiation to the buyer of a negotiable document of title covering the goods.

To stop delivery the seller must so notify as to enable the bailee by reasonable diligence to prevent delivery of the goods.

After that notification the bailee must hold and deliver the goods according to the direction of the seller, but the seller is liable to the bailee for any ensuing charges or damages.

If a negotiable document of title has been issued for goods, the bailee is not obliged to obey a notification to stop until surrender of possession or control of the document.

A carrier who has issued a nonnegotiable bill of lading is not obliged to obey a notification to stop received from a person other than the consignor.

History.

(§ 2.705 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 24, 25 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote (b)(3), which read, “that acknowledgment to the buyer by a carrier by reshipment or as warehouseman;”; in (e), added “possession or control of” following “stop until surrender of”.

Sec. 45.02.706.
Seller’s resale including contract for resale.

Under the conditions stated in AS

45.02.703

on seller’s remedies, the seller may resell the goods concerned or the undelivered balance of the goods. If the resale is made in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner, the seller may recover the difference between the resale price and the contract price together with incidental damages allowed under AS

45.02.710

, but less expenses saved in consequence of the buyer’s breach.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section or unless otherwise agreed, resale may be at public or private sale including sale by way of one or more contracts to sell or of identification to an existing contract of the seller. Sale may be as a unit or in parcels and at any time and place and on any terms, but every aspect of the sale including the method, manner, time, place, and terms must be commercially reasonable. The resale must be reasonably identified as referring to the broken contract, but it is not necessary that the goods be in existence or that any or all of them have been identified to the contract before the breach.

If the resale is at private sale, the seller must give the buyer reasonable notification of the intention to resell.

If the resale is at public sale,

only identified goods can be sold unless there is a recognized market for a public sale of futures in goods of the kind;

it must be made at a usual place or market for public sale if one is reasonably available, and, except in the case of goods that are perishable or threaten to decline in value speedily, the seller must give the buyer reasonable notice of the time and place of the resale;

if the goods are not to be within the view of those attending the sale, the notification of sale must state the place where the goods are located and provide for their reasonable inspection by prospective bidders; and

the seller may buy.

A purchaser who buys in good faith at a resale takes the goods free of rights of the original buyer even though the seller fails to comply with one or more of the requirements of this section.

The seller is not accountable to the buyer for a profit made on a resale. A person in the position of a seller (AS

45.02.707

), or a buyer who has rightfully rejected or justifiably revoked acceptance must account for an excess over the amount of the person’s security interest, as defined in AS

45.02.711(c)

.

History.

(§ 2.706 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 37 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (d), deleted “and” at the end of (d)(1) and (d)(2).

Collateral references. —

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 969 et seq.

Resale of goods under UCC § 2-706, 101 ALR5th 563.

Sec. 45.02.707.
Person in the position of a seller.

A person in the position of a seller includes, as against a principal, an agent who has paid or become responsible for the price of goods on behalf of the principal or anyone who otherwise holds a security interest or other right in goods similar to that of a seller.

A person in the position of a seller may withhold or stop delivery (AS

45.02.705

) and resell (AS

45.02.706

) and recover incidental damages (AS

45.02.710

).

History.

(§ 2.707 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.708.
Seller’s damages for nonacceptance or repudiation.

Subject to (b) of this section and to the provisions with respect to proof of market price (AS

45.02.723

), the measure of damages for nonacceptance or repudiation by the buyer is the difference between the market price at the time and place for tender and the unpaid contract price together with any incidental damages provided in AS

45.02.710

, but less expenses saved in consequence of the buyer’s breach.

If the measure of damages provided in (a) of this section is inadequate to put the seller in as good a position as performance would have done, then the measure of damages is the profit, including reasonable overhead, that the seller would have made from full performance by the buyer, together with any incidental damages provided in AS

45.02.710

, due allowance for costs reasonably incurred, and due credit for payments or proceeds of resale.

History.

(§ 2.708 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.709.
Action for the price.

If the buyer fails to pay the price as it becomes due, the seller may recover, together with any incidental damages under AS

45.02.710

, the price

of goods accepted or of conforming goods lost or damaged within a commercially reasonable time after risk of their loss has passed to the buyer; and

of goods identified to the contract if the seller is unable, after reasonable effort, to resell them at a reasonable price or the circumstances reasonably indicate that a reasonable effort will be unavailing.

If the seller sues for the price, the seller must hold for the buyer goods that have been identified to the contract and are still in the control of the seller, except that if resale becomes possible the seller may resell them at any time before the collection of the judgment. The net proceeds of this resale must be credited to the buyer and payment of the judgment entitles the buyer to goods not resold.

After the buyer has wrongfully rejected or revoked acceptance of the goods or has failed to make a payment due or has repudiated (AS

45.02.610

), a seller who is held not entitled to the price under this section shall nevertheless be awarded damages for nonacceptance under AS

45.02.708

.

History.

(§ 2.709 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.710.
Seller’s incidental damages.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved seller include commercially reasonable charges, expenses, or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care, and custody of goods after the buyer’s breach, in connection with return or resale of the goods or otherwise resulting from the breach.

History.

(§ 2.710 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.711.
Buyer’s remedies in general; buyer’s security interest in rejected goods.

If the seller fails to make delivery or repudiates or the buyer rightfully rejects or justifiably revokes acceptance, then, with respect to goods involved and with respect to the whole if the breach goes to the whole contract (AS

45.02.612

), the buyer may cancel and, whether or not the buyer has done so, may, in addition to recovering so much of the price as has been paid,

“cover” and have damages under AS

45.02.712

as to all the goods affected, whether or not they have been identified to the contract; or

recover damages for nondelivery as provided in AS

45.02.713

.

If the seller fails to deliver or repudiates, the buyer may also

if the goods have been identified, recover them as provided in AS

45.02.502

; or

in a proper case obtain specific performance or replevy the goods as provided in AS

45.02.716

.

On rightful rejection or justifiable revocation of acceptance, a buyer has a security interest in goods in the possession or control of the buyer for payments made on their price and expenses reasonably incurred in their inspection, receipt, transportation, care, and custody and may hold the goods and resell them in like manner as an aggrieved seller (AS

45.02.706

).

History.

(§ 2.711 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.712.
“Cover”; buyer’s procurement of substitute goods.

After a breach within AS

45.02.711

, the buyer may “cover” by making in good faith and without unreasonable delay a reasonable purchase of or contract to purchase goods in substitution for those due from the seller.

The buyer may recover from the seller as damages the difference between the cost of cover and the contract price together with any incidental or consequential damages as defined in AS

45.02.715

, but less expenses saved in consequence of the seller’s breach.

Failure of the buyer to effect cover within this section does not bar the buyer from any other remedy.

History.

(§ 2.712 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 1039 et seq.

What constitutes “cover” upon breach by seller under UCC § 2-712(1), 79 ALR4th 844.

Sec. 45.02.713.
Buyer’s damages for nondelivery or repudiation.

Subject to the provisions with respect to proof of market price (AS

45.02.723

), the measure of damages for nondelivery or repudiation by the seller is the difference between the market price at the time when the buyer learned of the breach and the contract price together with any incidental and consequential damages provided in AS

45.02.715

, but less expenses saved in consequence of the seller’s breach.

Market price is to be determined as of the place for tender or, in cases of rejection after arrival or revocation of acceptance, as of the place of arrival.

History.

(§ 2.713 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 1135 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.714.
Buyer’s damages for breach in regard to accepted goods.

If the buyer has accepted goods and given notification (AS

45.02.607(c)

), the buyer may recover as damages for a nonconformity of tender the loss resulting in the ordinary course of events from the seller’s breach as determined in a reasonable manner.

The measure of damages for breach of warranty is the difference at the time and place of acceptance between the value of the goods accepted and the value they would have had if they had been as warranted, unless special circumstances show proximate damages of a different amount.

In a proper case any incidental and consequential damages under AS

45.02.715

may also be recovered.

History.

(§ 2.714 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.715.
Buyer’s incidental and consequential damages.

Incidental damages resulting from the seller’s breach include expenses reasonably incurred in inspection, receipt, transportation, and care and custody of goods rightfully rejected, any commercially reasonable charges, expenses, or commissions in connection with effecting cover and other reasonable expense incident to the delay or other breach.

Consequential damages resulting from the seller’s breach include

loss resulting from general or particular requirements and needs of which the seller at the time of contracting had reason to know and that could not reasonably be prevented by cover or otherwise; and

injury to person or property proximately resulting from a breach of warranty.

History.

(§ 2.715 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.716.
Buyer’s right to specific performance or replevin.

Specific performance may be decreed where the goods are unique or in other proper circumstances.

The decree for specific performance may include such terms and conditions as to payment of the price, damages, or other relief as the court considers just.

The buyer has a right of replevin for goods identified to the contract if after reasonable effort the buyer is unable to effect cover for the goods or the circumstances reasonably indicate that such effort will be unavailing or if the goods have been shipped under reservation and satisfaction of the security interest in them has been made or tendered. In the case of goods bought for personal, family, or household purposes, the buyer’s right of replevin vests upon acquisition of a special property even if the seller had not then repudiated or failed to deliver.

History.

(§ 2.716 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 11 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.02.717.
Deduction of damages from the price.

The buyer on notifying the seller of the intention to do so may deduct all or any part of the damages resulting from a breach of the contract from any part of the price still due under the same contract.

History.

(§ 2.717 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.718.
Liquidation or limitation of damages; deposits.

Damages for breach by either party may be liquidated in the agreement but only at an amount that is reasonable in the light of the anticipated or actual harm caused by the breach, the difficulties of proof of loss, and the inconvenience or nonfeasibility of otherwise obtaining an adequate remedy. A term fixing unreasonably large liquidated damages is void as a penalty.

If the seller justifiably withholds delivery of goods because of the buyer’s breach, the buyer is entitled to restitution of an amount by which the sum of the buyer’s payments exceeds

the amount to which the seller is entitled by virtue of terms liquidating the seller’s damages in accordance with (a) of this section, or

in the absence of those terms, 20 percent of the value of the total performance for which the buyer is obligated under the contract or $500, whichever is smaller.

The buyer’s right to restitution under (b) of this section is subject to offset to the extent that the seller establishes

a right to recover damages under this chapter other than (a) of this section, and

the amount or value of benefits received by the buyer directly or indirectly by reason of the contract.

If a seller has received payment in goods, their reasonable value or the proceeds of their resale shall be treated as payments for the purposes of (b) of this section; but, if the seller has notice of the buyer’s breach before reselling goods received in part performance, the resale is subject to the conditions laid down on resale by an aggrieved seller (AS

45.02.706

).

History.

(§ 2.718 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67A Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, §§ 823 to 829.

Contractual liquidated damages provisions under UCC Art. 2 [AS

45.02.101

—

45.02.725

], 98 ALR3d 586.

Sec. 45.02.719.
Contractual modification or limitation of remedy.

Subject to (b) and (c) of this section and AS

45.02.718

on liquidation and limitation of damages,

the agreement may provide for remedies in addition to or in substitution for those provided in this chapter and may limit or alter the measure of damages recoverable under this chapter, as by limiting the buyer’s remedies to return of the goods and repayment of the price or to repair and replacement of nonconforming goods or parts; and

resort to a remedy as provided is optional unless the remedy is expressly agreed to be exclusive, in which case it is the sole remedy.

If circumstances cause an exclusive or limited remedy to fail of its essential purpose, remedy may be had as provided in the code.

Consequential damages may be limited or excluded unless the limitation or exclusion is unconscionable. Limitation of consequential damages for injury to the person in the case of consumer goods is prima facie unconscionable, but limitation of damages where the loss is commercial is not.

History.

(§ 2.719 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993, the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

Sec. 45.02.720.
Effect of cancellation or rescission on claims for antecedent breach.

Unless the contrary intention clearly appears, expressions of cancellation or rescission of the contract or the like shall not be construed as a renunciation or discharge of a claim in damages for an antecedent breach.

History.

(§ 2.720 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.721.
Remedies for fraud.

Remedies for material misrepresentation or fraud include all remedies available under this chapter for nonfraudulent breach.
Neither rescission or a claim for rescission of the contract for sale nor rejection or return of the goods bars or is inconsistent with a claim for damages or other remedy.

History.

(§ 2.721 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.722.
Who can sue third parties for injury to goods.

If a third party so deals with goods that have been identified to a contract for sale as to cause actionable injury to a party to that contract,

a right of action against the third party is in either party to the contract for sale who has title to or a security interest or a special property or an insurable interest in the goods; and, if the goods have been destroyed or converted, a right of action is also in the party who either bore the risk of loss under the contract for sale or has since the injury assumed that risk as against the other;

if at the time of the injury the party plaintiff did not fear the risk of loss as against the other party to the contract for sale and there is no arrangement between them for disposition of the recovery, the party plaintiff’s suit or settlement is, subject to the party’s own interest, as a fiduciary for the other party to the contract;

either party may with the consent of the other sue for the benefit of whom it may concern.

History.

(§ 2.722 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.723.
Proof of market price; time and place.

If an action based on anticipatory repudiation comes to trial before the time for performance with respect to some or all of the goods, damages based on market price (AS

45.02.708

or

45.02.713

) shall be determined according to the price of the goods prevailing at the time the aggrieved party learned of the repudiation.

If evidence of a price prevailing at the times or places described in this chapter is not readily available, the price prevailing within a reasonable time before or after the time described or at any other place that in commercial judgment or under usage of trade would serve as a reasonable substitute for the one described may be used, making a proper allowance for the cost of transporting the goods to or from the other place.

Evidence of a relevant price prevailing at a time or place other than the one described in this chapter offered by one party is not admissible until the party has given the other party notice the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise.

History.

(§ 2.723 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.724.
Admissibility of market quotations.

When the prevailing price or value of goods regularly bought and sold in an established commodity market is in issue, reports in official publications or trade journals or in newspapers or periodicals of general circulation published as the reports of the market are admissible in evidence.
The circumstances of the preparation of such a report may be shown to affect its weight but not its admissibility.

History.

(§ 2.724 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.725.
Statute of limitations in contracts for sale.

An action for breach of a contract for sale must be commenced within four years after the cause of action has accrued. By the original agreement the parties may reduce the period of limitation to not less than one year but may not extend it.

A cause of action accrues when the breach occurs, regardless of the aggrieved party’s lack of knowledge of the breach. A breach of warranty occurs when tender of delivery is made, except that, if a warranty explicitly extends to future performance of the goods and discovery of the breach must await the time of performance, the cause of action accrues when the breach is or should have been discovered.

If an action commenced within the time limited by (a) of this section is so terminated as to leave available a remedy by another action for the same breach, the other action may be commenced after the expiration of the time limited and within six months after the termination of the first action unless the termination resulted from voluntary discontinuance or from dismissal for failure or neglect to prosecute.

This section does not alter the law on tolling of the statute of limitations nor does it apply to causes of action that accrue before midnight, December 31, 1962.

History.

(§ 2.725 ch 114 SLA 1962)